Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1303
Personnel division within the Department of Administrative Services; director; appointment.

There is hereby established a division within the Department of Administrative Services to be known as the personnel division, to be headed by a Director of Personnel. The director shall be appointed by the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1967, c. 573, § 3, p. 1889;

Laws 1969, c. 802, § 4, p. 3022;

Laws 1971, LB 1030, § 2;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 12.